District of Columbia statutes.
47-2805.02

Requirement for social security number.

The social security number of each applicant for a license issued pursuant to this chapter, for membership in the bar of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals pursuant to § 11-2501, and for any recreational license issued in the District of Columbia shall be recorded on the application. If a number other than the social security number is used on the face of the license or membership document, the issuing agency or entity shall keep the applicant’s social security number on file and the applicant shall be so advised.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 112(c), 48 DCR 1270
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 111(c) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 112(c) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).